New Mexico, session 2026, SB79.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Two million dollars ($2,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the department of health for expenditure in fiscal years 2027 and 2028 for mosquito surveillance, prevention and mitigation. The department of health may use up to one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) to provide grants to local governments and state educational institutions enumerated in Article 12, Section 11 of the constitution of New Mexico for mosquito surveillance, prevention and mitigation projects. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2028 shall revert to the general fund.